District of Columbia statutes.
42-401

Effective date of deeds; exception.

Any deed conveying real property in the District, or interest therein, or declaring or limiting any use or trust thereof, executed and acknowledged and certified as provided in §§ 42-101, 42-121 to 42-123 [repealed], 42-306, and 42-602 and delivered to the person in whose favor the same is executed, shall be held to take effect from the date of the delivery thereof, except that as to creditors and subsequent bona fide purchasers and mortgagees without notice of said deed, and others interested in said property, it shall only take effect from the time of its delivery to the Recorder of Deeds for record.

Apr. 29, 1878, 20 Stat. 39, ch. 69
Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1268, ch. 854, § 499
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 531, ch. 1329
Horizontal property regimes, record defined, see § 42-2002.
Recording instrument by one who has no color of title, penalties, see § 22-1402.
This section is referenced in § 42-2002.
1981 Ed., § 45-801.
1973 Ed., § 45-501.
Sections 42-121 to 42-123, referred to in this section, were repealed March 6, 1991, by § 12(a) of D.C. Law 8-205.